Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-921
Organization under unconstitutional law; reorganization; procedure.

The board of trustees of any cemetery district organized under the provisions of any law which has been held unconstitutional may petition the county board of the county containing the greater portion of the land included in such district for approval of its organization. After notice and hearing as provided in section 12-911, the county board, if it determines that such district complies with the requirements of section 12-909 and that the approval of its organization would promote public health, convenience, or welfare, shall approve its organization and it shall thereupon become subject to all the provisions of sections 12-909 to 12-921. If necessary to insure compliance with the requirements of section 12-909, the county board, as a part of its order of approval, may order the addition to or withdrawal from such district of such land as it may deem necessary to promote public health, convenience, or welfare. When any such district shall be reorganized under the provisions of this section, the county treasurer shall transfer to the reorganized district all funds standing to the credit of the old district. The funds standing to the credit of any district not reorganized under the provisions of this section within one year after October 19, 1963, shall be transferred to the general fund of the county.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 13, p. 142;

Laws 1963, c. 41, § 1, p. 214.